Colorado statutes. TITLE 32 Special Districts
ARTICLE 9 REGIONAL TRANSPORTATION DISTRICT ACT
32-9-119.4. Election for a sales tax rate increase - petition requirement.

For purposes of complying with the provisions of section 20 (4) of article X of the state constitution and upon receipt of a notice from the secretary of state stating that a valid petition has been filed and verified and the adoption by the board of an appropriate resolution, the board may submit to the registered electors within the geographical boundaries of the district at any general election or election held in November of an odd-numbered year, the ballot question set forth in subsection (3) of this section.

A valid petition:

Shall request that the board submit the ballot question set forth in subsection (3) of this section to the registered electors within the geographical boundaries of the district;

Shall be signed by a number of such registered electors equal to at least five percent of the total number of votes cast within the geographical boundaries of the district for all candidates for the office of secretary of state at the previous general election; and

Shall have the required signatures verified by the secretary of state in accordance with subsection (4) of this section.

Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection (3), the ballot question to be submitted by the board pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall be as follows:

The ballot question set forth in paragraph (a) of this subsection (3) may be modified by the proponents of a petition or by the district to the extent necessary to conform to the legal requirements for ballot questions and titles.

If at any election a majority of the registered electors within the geographical boundaries of the district voting on the ballot question vote affirmatively on the ballot question specified in paragraph (a) of this subsection (3), then the rate of sales tax levied by the district shall be increased by four-tenths of one percent to a rate of one percent.

The provisions of article 40 of title 1, C.R.S., regarding the following subject matter shall apply to petitions that may be submitted pursuant to this section: Form requirements and approval; circulation of petitions; elector information and signatures on petitions; affidavits and requirements of circulators of petitions; and verification of signatures, including, but not limited to, cure of an insufficiency of signatures and protests regarding sufficiency statements and procedures for hearings or further appeals regarding such protests. The provisions of article 40 of title 1, C.R.S., regarding review and comment, the setting of a ballot title, including, but not limited to, the duties of the title board, rehearings and appeals, and the number of signatures required shall not apply to petitions that may be submitted pursuant to this section.

Any petition shall be filed with the secretary of state at least ninety days before the election at which the ballot question specified in the petition is to be submitted to the registered electors within the geographical boundaries of the district. Notice of any question to be submitted to the registered electors within the geographical boundaries of the district after verification of the signatures on any petition filed with the secretary of state and at which election such question shall be submitted shall be filed by the board in the office of the secretary of state prior to fifty-five days before the election.

Prior to the general election at which any question is to be submitted to the registered electors pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, the board shall hold at least two public hearings in each of the counties included, in whole or in part, within the district.

No public moneys from the state or any city, town, city and county, or county shall be expended by the public entity or by any private entity or private person to advertise, promote, or purchase commercial promotion or advertisement to urge electors to vote in favor of or against any question submitted at an election pursuant to the provisions of this section.

No question submitted to eligible electors of the district pursuant to this section shall obligate any funds of the department of transportation, nor shall the approval of a question by the eligible electors be construed as creating any commitment or obligation of funds of the department.

If at any election a majority of the registered electors within the geographical boundaries of the district voting on the question vote in the affirmative on a ballot question to increase the rate of sales tax levied by the district and then, in a corresponding or subsequent election, a majority of the registered electors within the geographical boundaries of the district voting on the question vote in the affirmative to lower the rate of sales tax levied by the district, the district shall decrease the rate of the sales tax to six-tenths of one percent or to an amount necessary to repay all indebtedness of the district obligated under the approved sales tax increase, including any costs incurred with regard to necessary debt repayment brought on by a corresponding or subsequent sales tax reduction, and following such repayment to six-tenths of one percent.

"Shall regional transportation district taxes be increased (first full fiscal year dollar increase) annually and by whatever additional amounts are raised annually thereafter by increasing the rate of sales tax levied by the district by four-tenths of one percent, from the current six-tenths of one percent to one percent commencing January 1 (first calendar year that commences after the election at which the ballot question is submitted), and, in connection therewith, shall regional transportation district debt be increased (principal amount), with a repayment cost of (maximum total district cost) with all proceeds of debt and taxes to be used and spent for the construction and operation of a fixed guideway mass transit system, the construction of additional park-n-ride lots, the expansion and improvement of existing park-n-ride lots, and increased bus service, including the use of smaller buses and vans and alternative fuel vehicles as appropriate, as specified in the transit expansion plan adopted by the board of directors of the district on or before (specified date) and shall debt be evidenced by bonds, notes, or other multiple-fiscal year obligations including refunding bonds that may be issued as a lower or higher rate of interest and including debt that may have a redemption prior to maturity with or without payment of a premium, payable from all revenues generated by said tax increase, federal funds, investment income, public and private contributions, and other revenues as the board may determine, and with such revenues raised by the sales tax rate increase and the proceeds of debt obligations and any investment income on such revenues and proceeds being exempt from the revenue and spending restrictions contained in section 20 of article X of the Colorado constitution until such time as all debt is repaid when the rate of tax will be decreased to that amount necessary for the continued operation of the system but not less than six-tenths of one percent?"

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire section added, p. 714, § 5, effective August 7; entire section added, p. 734, § 5, effective August 7.

32-9-119.5. Competition to provide vehicular service within the regional transportation district - definition.

The general assembly hereby finds, determines, and declares that: Public transportation services are provided to assist the transit-dependent and the poor, to relieve congestion, and to minimize automotive pollution; public transportation service should be provided at the lowest possible cost consistent with desired service and safety; private transportation providers have been effectively used under competitive contracts to provide public transportation services at lower costs and with lower annual cost increases; obtaining cost-competitive public transportation services requires the establishment of a mechanism for competitive contracting; facilities and vehicles purchased for public transportation service are public assets which are held in the public trust; contracting for services has historically provided opportunities for minority, women, and disadvantaged business enterprises; and it is the intent of the general assembly that disadvantaged business enterprises, as defined in part 23 of title 49 of the code of federal regulations, as amended, shall have the maximum opportunity to participate in the performance of contracts.

The district may implement a system under which up to fifty-eight percent of the district's vehicular service is provided by qualified private businesses, nonprofit organizations, or local governments pursuant to competitively negotiated contracts.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2003, p. 1795, § 2, effective May 21, 2003.)

The district shall promulgate reasonable standards with respect to experience, safety records, and financial responsibility by which private providers can be qualified to provide vehicular services pursuant to this section.

The district shall prepare a standard form of agreement to provide vehicular services. Such contract shall include:

The specification of reasonable passenger comfort and safety characteristics of the equipment used;

The specification of standards for access to vehicular services for persons with disabilities, which shall be as specified in the district's plan for such services as approved by the federal transit administration;

The specification for reasonable training and safety records to be required of any driver;

A provision for reasonable insurance protecting the district from liability for the acts, negligence, or omission of the provider, its agents, and its employees;

Reasonable standards for reliability and on-time performance;

Reasonable penalties for inadequate performance, including the district's right to cancel the contract;

Provisions for the use of the district's logo, transfers, transit ways, bus stops, and such other elements as are owned by the district and appropriate for use by the provider to provide coordinated service with the district;

A provision that the provider shall retain fifty to one hundred percent of the passenger fares and remit the balance of such fares to the district;

A provision that the provider, at its sole risk and in compliance with applicable laws and regulations, shall have the right to sell additional services, including food and other services to its passengers, and to sell advertising except as prohibited by existing contracts, freight, charter, and other services using the provider's vehicles;

The term of the agreement, which shall be as follows:

For any agreement under which the district shall supply vehicles for use by the provider and if such vehicles have been financed under any section of the federal "Internal Revenue Code of 1986", as amended, that provides tax-free status for such vehicles, a term of not more than three years, including any renewal options;

For any agreement under which the district shall supply vehicles for use by the provider and if such vehicles have not been financed under any section of the federal "Internal Revenue Code of 1986", as amended, that provides tax-free status for such vehicles, a term of not more than five years, including any renewal options; or

For any agreement under which the provider shall supply its own vehicles, a term of years as negotiated by the district and the provider; and

No provision specifying wages, benefits, work rules, work conditions, or union organization of the employees of the provider beyond compliance with applicable regulation and law, including compliance with the "Federal Transit Act", 49 U.S.C. sec. 5333 (b).

Subject to the requirements of the "Federal Transit Act", as amended, the district may request proposals from qualified providers to provide up to fifty-eight percent of all of the vehicular service of the district as measured by platform time or platform time equivalents. The district's decision as to which vehicular services are subject to requests for proposals must represent the district's total vehicular service operations; except that each individual request for proposals may designate one type of vehicular service. Service provided by private businesses, nonprofit organizations, or local governments pursuant to this section shall be accomplished through attrition of the district's full-time employees. Layoffs shall not occur solely as a result of the implementation of this section. If the director of the division of labor standards and statistics in the department of labor and employment orders an arbitration pursuant to section

8-3-113 (3)

, the arbitrator shall not have the power to establish a level of vehicular service to be provided by private businesses, nonprofit organizations, or local governments in accordance with this section.
(3) (a) (I) Subject to the requirements of the "Federal Transit Act", as amended, the district may request proposals from qualified providers to provide up to fifty-eight percent of all of the vehicular service of the district as measured by platform time or platform time equivalents. The district's decision as to which vehicular services are subject to requests for proposals must represent the district's total vehicular service operations; except that each individual request for proposals may designate one type of vehicular service. Service provided by private businesses, nonprofit organizations, or local governments pursuant to this section shall be accomplished through attrition of the district's full-time employees. Layoffs shall not occur solely as a result of the implementation of this section. If the director of the division of labor standards and statistics in the department of labor and employment orders an arbitration pursuant to section

8-3-113 (3)

, the arbitrator shall not have the power to establish a level of vehicular service to be provided by private businesses, nonprofit organizations, or local governments in accordance with this section.

The district shall establish reasonable standards for platform time equivalents for all vehicular services that are not ordinarily measured by platform time.

Each request for proposals shall specify the route or service area, service frequency or hours of operation, and the entire structure of maximum fares determined by the district. Such request for proposals shall include the district's estimate of passenger revenue. Each request for proposals shall also specify any federal funds available for vehicle capital assistance whether through reimbursement of eligible depreciation expenses or through lease of vehicles owned by the district.

Each individual request for proposals shall reflect the district's determination as to the appropriate size for each such request in order to maximize the number of qualified providers submitting proposals without causing undue operating inefficiencies.

Each request for proposals shall specify all of the evaluation factors to be used by the district in awarding the contract and the weight to be given by the district for each factor. The evaluation factors shall include the cost to the district, cost related factors, non-cost factors such as performance history of comparable services provided in-state or out-of-state, financial stability, managerial experience, operational plan, employee recruitment and training, and any other factors identified by the district. No award shall be made based on cost to the district alone, and in no event shall such cost be weighted more than thirty-five percent in making an award determination.

Any qualified provider may respond to any request for proposals. The district shall ensure that disadvantaged business enterprises, as defined in part 23 of title 49 of the code of federal regulations, as amended, have the greatest possible opportunity to respond. Any response shall be timely if received by the district within the time specified in its request for proposals, which shall not exceed ninety days nor be less than forty-five days. Each response shall specify the least cost to the district required by the provider submitting the proposal to provide the services described in the request for proposals. If it determines the public interest requires such, the district retains the right to enter into noncompetitively awarded contracts on an interim basis for the time needed to implement the request for proposal process.

With respect to each request for proposals, the district shall award the contract based on a consideration of the evaluation factors established pursuant to paragraph (c.5) of this subsection (3). Each contract shall be effective not later than ninety days after its award. If the district determines that no responsive proposals are received for a request for proposals or that the proposals submitted would not be in the best interests of the district to accept, the district may reject such proposals and may, in its discretion, solicit new proposals for the designated service in accordance with the provisions of this section.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 98, p. 126, § 1, effective August 5, 1998.)

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2003, p. 1795, § 2, effective May 21, 2003.)

Any person qualified to provide vehicular services pursuant to subsection (2) of this section who does not require a district subsidy shall be able to provide vehicular services within the district. Such person shall execute the district's standard form of agreement to provide vehicular services; except that such person shall be free to determine and retain passenger fares. Vehicles operated pursuant to this subsection (5) shall be identified to the public as charging fares not established by the district.

Fares for vehicular services provided pursuant to this section shall be exempt from sales or use taxes imposed pursuant to article 26 of title 39, C.R.S. Providers shall not otherwise be exempt from property, sales, income, excise, and other taxes.

The provision of vehicular services in accordance with this section shall not be subject to regulation by the public utilities commission of the state of Colorado; except that taxi service as defined in the commission's rules shall be subject to regulation by the commission.

For purposes of providing legislative oversight of the operation of this section, the transportation legislation review committee shall review the district's implementation of this section and recommend any necessary changes to the general assembly.

Repealed.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2007, p. 970, § 1, effective August 3, 2007.)

As used in this section, "local government" means any county, city and county, city, town, district, authority, or other political subdivision of the state, or any department, agency, or instrumentality thereof, or any other entity, organization, or corporation formed by intergovernmental agreement or other contract between or among any of the foregoing.

Source:

L. 88:

Entire section added, p. 1152, § 1, effective May 3.

L. 90:

(2)(a), (2)(d)(X), and (3)(c) to (3)(e) amended, p. 1512, § 1, effective April 9.

L. 92:

(2)(d)(II) amended, p. 1345, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 94:

(8)(a) amended, p. 622, § 2, effective April 14.

L. 96:

(3)(e) amended, p. 1883, § 1, effective June 8; (8)(b) repealed, p. 1274, § 209, effective August 7.

L. 98:

(3)(e) amended, p. 126, § 1, effective August 5.

L. 99:

(2)(a), (2)(d)(X), and (3)(a) amended, p. 940, § 1, effective May 28.

L. 2003:

(2)(a), (2)(b), (2)(c), IP(2)(d), (2)(d)(II), (2)(d)(XI), (3)(a), (3)(b), (3)(e)(I), (4), (5), (6), and (7) amended and (3)(c.5) added, p. 1795, § 2, effective May 21.

L. 2007:

(2)(a), (3)(a)(I), and (9) amended, p. 970, § 1, effective August 3.

L. 2016:

(3)(a)(I) amended, (HB 16-1323), ch. 131, p. 381, § 21, effective August 10.

L. 2021:

(2)(a) and (3)(a) amended and (10) added, (HB 21-1186), ch. 182, p. 980, § 1, effective September 7.

32-9-119.6. Report to general assembly on privatization of certain management functions of the district. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 88:

Entire section added, p. 1155, § 2, effective May 3.

L. 96:

Entire section repealed, p. 1274, § 211, effective, August 7.

32-9-119.7. Cost efficiency of transit services - reporting - plans.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that surface transportation in the Denver metropolitan area is a major problem confronting not only the citizens of the metropolitan area but also the citizens of the entire state of Colorado. The general assembly further finds that, although mass transportation is one component of an effective surface transportation system, the allocation of resources to mass transportation must be made in light of all surface transportation needs. The general assembly further finds that the district should be organized efficiently, economically, and on a demand-responsive basis and that the district should consider least-cost alternatives in discharging its responsibilities.

For the purposes of this section, "operating costs" means all expenditures, including depreciation, except for those incurred in long-term planning and development of mass transportation and rapid transit infrastructures and those costs incurred as a result of providing transportation service mandated by the federal "Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990", 42 U.S.C. sec. 12101 through 12213.

The district shall include in its annual financial reporting information on annual operating costs, ridership numbers, and operating costs divided by ridership as measures of the cost efficiency of the services the district provides.

The district shall submit copies of its annual budget to the transportation legislation review committee created in section 43-2-145.

Repealed.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2002, p. 866, § 3, effective August 7, 2002.)

The district shall submit to the transportation legislation review committee any information, data, testimony, audits, or other information the committee may request.

Source:

L. 89:

Entire section added, p. 1318, § 1, effective June 5.

L. 93:

(2) amended, p. 352, § 1, effective April 12.

L. 94:

(4) and (7) amended, p. 622, § 3, effective April 14.

L. 2002:

(6) and (7) amended, p. 866, § 3, effective August 7.

L. 2021:

(1), (2), (3), and (4) amended and (5) repealed, (HB 21-1186), ch. 182, p. 981, § 2, effective September 7.

32-9-119.8. Provision of retail and commercial goods and services at district transfer facilities - residential and other uses at district transfer facilities permitted - definitions.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Local zoning ordinance" means an applicable legislative act enacted by any municipality, county, or city and county in which a transfer facility is located that relates to the planning and zoning of real property.

"Public entity" includes, but is not limited to, a public body, as that term is defined in section 32-9-103 (11), and any other governmental entity, agency, or official, including an urban renewal authority and the department of transportation.

"Residential use or other use" means any residential use, as defined in section 38-33.3-103, C.R.S., or other use permitted by an applicable local zoning ordinance.

"Transfer facility" means a public park-n-ride, bus terminal, light rail station, or other bus or rail transfer facility owned or operated by the district whether the property on which the facility is located is owned by the district or leased by the district from any other entity.

Except as provided in subsection (2.5) of this section, the district may negotiate and enter into agreements with any person or public entity for the provision of retail and commercial goods and services to the public at transfer facilities or for the provision of residential uses or other uses at such facilities. The district itself shall not provide retail and commercial goods and services at transfer facilities pursuant to this section, except for the sale of mass transportation tickets, tokens, passes, and other transactions directly and necessarily related to the operation of a mass transportation system. The district may negotiate and enter into agreements with third parties to provide any of the goods and services or other uses contemplated under this section.

(2.5) The district shall notify and obtain the approval of the executive director of the department of transportation before negotiating and entering into any agreement with any person or public entity for the provision of retail and commercial goods and services to the public or the provision of residential uses or other uses at a transfer facility that is located on property that is owned by the department of transportation and leased to the district for the operation of such transfer facility.

Any person obtaining the use of any portion of a transfer facility for the provision of retail or commercial goods or services or for the provision of residential uses or other uses shall be required to compensate the district by payment of rent at fair market value, or, at the discretion of the district, by the provision of services or capital improvements to facilities used in transit services, alone or in combination with rental payments, such that the total benefit to the district is not less than the fair market rental value of the property used by the person.

The use of a transfer facility for the provision of retail or commercial goods or services or for the provision of residential uses or other uses shall not be permitted if the use would reduce transit services. The provision of retail and commercial goods and services or the provision of residential uses or other uses at transfer facilities shall be designed to offer convenience to transit customers and shall be conducted in a manner that encourages multimodal access from all users.

Any development of any portion of a transfer facility made available by the district for the provision of retail or commercial goods or services or for the provision of residential uses or other uses shall be subject to all applicable local zoning ordinances.

Subject to subsection (2.5) of this section, section 43-3-101 (3), C.R.S., shall not bar the provision or sale of retail or commercial goods or services or the provision of residential uses or other uses conducted in accordance with the provisions of this section upon any property owned by the Colorado department of transportation and leased to the district for the operation of transfer facilities.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire section added, p. 342, § 1, effective April 19.

L. 99:

(2) and (6) amended and (2.5) added, p. 262, § 2, effective April 9.

L. 2010:

Entire section amended, (HB 10-1143), ch. 123, p. 408, § 1, effective August 11.

L. 2021:

(4) amended, (HB 21-1186), ch. 182, p. 982, § 3, effective September 7.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1999 act amending subsections (2) and (6) and enacting subsection (2.5), see section 1 of chapter 88, Session Laws of Colorado 1999.

32-9-119.9. Limited authority to charge fees for parking - reserved parking spaces - penalties - definitions.

The district may charge a parking fee at a district parking facility.

The district shall not charge a parking fee at a district parking facility pursuant to this subsection (1), prohibit parking pursuant to subsection (1.5) of this section, or enforce a penalty pursuant to subsection (4) of this section, which for purposes of this paragraph (b) includes treating a motor vehicle as abandoned, until it has posted signs warning of such parking fee, prohibition, or penalty at all entrances and exits to the facility for at least ninety days. The warning signs shall remain in place so long as the parking fee, prohibition, or penalty is in effect at the facility.

The district may require an individual to provide personal information, including, but not limited to, motor vehicle registration or driver's license information, in order to use reserved parking or automatic payment services offered by the district.

Repealed.

The district may establish customer accounts to permit persons who use a district parking facility to prepay parking fees.

(1.5) The district may establish rules prohibiting a person who is not using the mass transportation system from parking at a district parking facility.

The district may provide for reserved parking spaces at a facility for the use of its employees.

Repealed.

If a motor vehicle is parked at a district parking facility and the person who parks the motor vehicle either fails to pay a parking fee that is required by the district pursuant to the authority set forth in subsection (1) of this section or violates a rule established by the district pursuant to subsection (1.5) of this section, the district may impose a penalty on the owner of the vehicle for each day that the vehicle is parked at the facility. The district shall give written notice to the owner of the penalty and shall notify the owner that he or she may, within fourteen days of the notice from the district, request a hearing to dispute the penalty. The hearing shall be held within thirty days after receipt of the request from the owner and may be conducted in person or by telephone. No person engaged in conducting the hearing or participating in a decision shall be responsible to or subject to the supervision or direction of any person engaged in the performance of parking management functions for the district.

Any motor vehicle for which a penalty is assessed pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (4) that is left unattended at the district parking facility for more than four days shall be considered an abandoned motor vehicle subject to the provisions of part 18 of article 4 of title 42, C.R.S.

The board shall establish reasonable rules concerning the administration and enforcement of this section.

In order to aid in the enforcement of this section and to allow the district to carry out its functions, the department of revenue or an authorized agent of the department shall allow the district to inspect, on an as-needed basis, any motor vehicle registration electronic database that includes the name and address of any registered owner. The inspection of these records by the district is consistent with uses set forth in section 24-72-204 (7)(b)(I), C.R.S., and shall be done in accordance with the provisions of part 2 of article 72 of title 24, C.R.S. The district shall maintain such registration information for one year and shall not release such information to any party other than to the registered owner or as necessary to enforce the penalty set forth in subsection (4) of this section. After one year, the district shall destroy the registration information.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires, "district parking facility" or "facility" means a park-n-ride lot or any other parking lot or structure owned or leased and operated by the district.

A public or private entity may lease, own, or operate a parking lot or structure available for use by the general public at or near a district mass transit station. Unless such a parking lot or structure is operated under a contract with the district that specifies the terms of its use and operation and provides the district with a share of the parking revenues that it generates, the parking lot or structure is not a district parking facility.

Other local governments and the district shall consult with each other prior to the establishment of zoning, other authorization by a governmental body, or contracts required for privately owned or managed parking facilities intended for users of the district's mass transportation system.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire section added, p. 229, § 1, effective August 7.

L. 2007:

Entire section amended, p. 1000, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

(6) amended and (7) and (8) added, (SB 13-027), ch. 137, p. 449, § 2, effective April 26.

L. 2021:

(1)(a), (1)(c), (1)(e), (2), and (4)(a) amended and (1)(d) and (3) repealed, (HB 21-1186), ch. 182, p. 982, § 4, effective September 7.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in the 2013 act amending subsection (6) and adding subsections (7) and (8), see section 1 of chapter 137, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

32-9-120. Levy of taxes - limitations.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law or this article to the contrary, no general ad valorem property taxes shall be levied, directly or indirectly, by the district under the provisions of this article, except for the payment of any annual deficit, if any, in the operation and maintenance expenses of the district, such levy not to exceed one-half mill on each dollar of valuation for assessment each year.

Annually, the board shall determine the amount of money necessary to be raised by taxation for the coming year and shall fix a rate of levy, subject to the provisions of subsection (1) of this section, which rate when levied upon every dollar of valuation for assessment of taxable property within the district, together with any other unencumbered revenues and moneys of the district, shall raise that sum necessary to pay in full all interest and principal on securities of the district, except special obligations payable solely from the revenues of the district, and to pay, to the extent permitted by this section, all other obligations of the district that the district can pay under this article with taxes coming due within the coming year, but excluding any special obligations.

The board shall certify to the counties of the district and the city and county of Denver, in accordance with the schedule prescribed by section 39-5-128, C.R.S., the rate so fixed in subsection (2) of this section, with directions to such counties and the city and county of Denver to levy and collect such taxes upon the taxable property within their respective counties or the city and county and to levy and collect such other taxes pursuant to section 32-9-121.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 720, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-20-19.

L. 70:

p. 293, § 102.

L. 71:

p. 979, § 3.

L. 73:

p. 992, § 3.

L. 80:

(1) amended and (4) added, p. 683, § 5, effective May 1.

L. 81:

(1) amended, p. 1646, § 4, effective June 8.

L. 82:

(1) amended and (4) repealed, pp. 500, 502, §§ 4, 8, effective April 15.

L. 87:

(3) amended, p. 1407, § 4, effective April 22.

L. 2000:

(2) amended, p. 308, § 3, effective April 5.

32-9-121. Levies to cover deficiencies.

In the event that the sum produced from general ad valorem property tax levies totaling less than the maximum levy authorized by section 32-9-120 (1), together with any unencumbered revenues and moneys of the district, are insufficient to pay, when due, installments on contracts and securities of the district and interest thereon and to pay defaults and deficiencies, the board shall make such additional levies of taxes as may be necessary, subject to the provisions and limitations of section 32-9-120 (1), until such contracts and securities and interest thereon are fully paid. In no case shall the mill levy exceed one-half mill. No levies shall be made pursuant to this section to pay any amount of special obligations of the district payable solely from sales taxes and the revenues, or a combination thereof, of the district.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 720, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-20-20.

L. 73:

p. 992, § 4.

L. 80:

Entire section amended, p. 683, § 6, effective May 1.

L. 81:

Entire section amended, p. 1646, § 5, effective June 8.

L. 82:

Entire section amended, p. 500, § 5, effective April 15.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 308, § 4, effective April 5.

32-9-122. Levying and collecting taxes - lien.

It is the duty of the body having authority to levy taxes within each county or city and county of the district to levy the taxes provided in sections 32-9-120 and 32-9-121. It is the duty of all officials charged with the duty of collecting taxes to collect such taxes at the time and in the form and manner and with like interest and penalties as other taxes are collected, and when collected, to pay the same to the district. The payment of such collection shall be made as soon as practical after collection to the treasurer of the district and paid into the depository thereof to the credit of the district. All taxes levied under this article, together with interest thereon and penalties for default in payment thereof, and all costs of collecting the same, shall constitute, until paid, a perpetual lien on and against the property taxed, and such lien shall be on a parity with the tax lien of other taxes.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 721, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-20-21.

Cross references:

For collection of taxes, see article 10 of title 39.

32-9-123. Delinquent taxes.

If the taxes levied are not paid, then delinquent real property shall be sold at the regular tax sale for the payment of said taxes, interest, and penalties, in the manner provided by the statutes of the state for selling real property for the nonpayment of taxes. If there are no bids at said tax sale for the property so offered, said property shall be struck off to the county, and the county shall account to the district in the same manner as provided by law for accounting for school, town, and city taxes. Delinquent personal property shall be distrained and sold as provided by law. Nothing in this article shall be construed as preventing the collection in full of the proceeds of all levies of taxes lawfully made by the district, including without limitation any delinquencies, interest, penalties, and costs.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 721, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-20-22.

Cross references:

For the sale of tax liens, see article 11 of title 39.

32-9-123.5. Prohibition on borrowing by district.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, the district shall not borrow money for the purpose of acquisition, construction, continuing construction, or operation of mass transit facilities during the period from January 1, 1990, through May 9, 1990, and, during such time period, the district shall not issue any district securities evidencing such borrowing.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire section added, p. 1514, § 1, effective April 3.

32-9-124. Forms of borrowing.

Subject to the provisions of this article, the district, to carry out the purposes of this article, may borrow money and may issue the following district securities to evidence such borrowing: Notes, warrants, bonds, temporary bonds, refunding bonds, special obligation bonds, and interim notes.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 721, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-20-23.

32-9-125. Issuance of notes.

The district may borrow money in anticipation of general ad valorem property taxes, sales taxes, or revenues, or a combination thereof, and issue notes to evidence the amount so borrowed.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 721, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-20-24.

L. 73:

p. 992, § 5.

32-9-126. Issuance of warrants.

The district may defray the cost of any services or supplies, equipment, or other materials furnished to or for the benefit of the district by the issuance of warrants to evidence the amount due therefor in anticipation of general ad valorem property taxes, sales taxes, or revenues, or any combination thereof.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 721, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-20-25.

L. 73:

p. 993, § 6.